South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3600.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 7, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-7-95.  (A) The General Assembly or either of its respective bodies, a standing committee, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, or not less than five members of the General Assembly may review any executive order issued by the President of the United States which has not been affirmed by a vote of the Congress of the United States and signed into law as prescribed by the Constitution of the United States and request the Attorney General of this State to conduct further review of the presidential executive order. Upon such request, the Attorney General shall review the presidential executive order to determine the constitutionality of the order and whether the State should seek an exemption from the application of the order or seek to have the order declared to be an unconstitutional exercise of legislative authority by the President. Within thirty days of receipt of the initial request, the Attorney General shall submit a report containing his findings and recommendations to the General Assembly, the Governor, and post this report on the official website of the Office of the Attorney General. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State, a local government, a political subdivision, or any other publicly funded organization may not implement a presidential executive order that restricts a person's rights or that the Attorney General determines to be unconstitutional pursuant to the provisions of subsection (A) and which relates to: (1) pandemics or other health emergencies; (2) the regulation of natural resources; (3) the regulation of the agriculture industry; (4) the use of land; (5) the regulation of the financial sector as it relates to environmental, social, or governance standards; or (6) the regulation of the constitutional right to keep and bear arms. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----